Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.170

County lands assessment fund created—Rentals may be applied against assessments.

Moneys received as rentals of irrigated lands may be applied to the payment of current irrigation charges or assessments against the land.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.33.170. Prior: 1929 c 193 s 6; RRS s 4027-6.]